Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1190.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9601.1. Small diverse business. A veteran-owned business shall be considered a small diverse business. A veteran-owned business shall not be required to seek separate small diverse business verification to be considered a small diverse business.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213